apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<!-- vblex pstv paradigms, all checked -->
<pardef n="skil/les__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>les<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/ees__vblex">	
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>ees</l>       <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
<!--   <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ees</l>       <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etts</l>      <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ees</l>       <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ees</l>       <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åes</l>       <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ås</l>        <r>ees<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/innes__vblex">		
  <e>       <p><l>innes</l>     <r>innes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnes</l>     <r>innes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innes</l>     <r>innes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ins</l>       <r>innes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>antes</l>     <r>innes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ans</l>       <r>innes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="omg/ås__vblex"> 
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
<!--   <e r="LR"><p><l>åes</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åes</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åttes</l>     <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åts</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åes</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iks</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikkes</l>     <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ferde/s__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="møt/es__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lei/es__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ddes</l>      <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="treng/es__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
<!--   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="munnhog/ges__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>ges<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>ges<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>ges<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>ges<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>ges<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="en/es__vblex">
<!-- lexicalised passive+imperative isn't possible, todo? (not in nn at least) -->
<!--   <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gjenfødes">       <i>gjenfød</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trenges">         <i>treng</i><par n="treng/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enes">            <i>en</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ferdes">          <i>ferde</i><par n="ferde/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="finnes">          <i>f</i><par n="f/innes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forefinnes">      <i>foref</i><par n="f/innes__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grønkes">         <i>grønk</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="høres">           <i>hør</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leies">           <i>lei</i><par n="lei/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lenges">          <i>leng</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="munnhogges">      <i>munnhog</i><par n="munnhog/ges__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="munnhugges">      <i>munnhug</i><par n="munnhog/ges__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="møtes">           <i>møt</i><par n="møt/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omgås">           <i>omg</i><par n="omg/ås__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ryktes">          <i>rykte</i><par n="ferde/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sees">            <i>s</i><par n="s/ees__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skilles">         <i>skil</i><par n="skil/les__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skyldes">         <i>skyld</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stanges">         <i>stang</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="times">           <i>tim</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undres">          <i>undre</i><par n="ferde/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="våres">           <i>vår</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ynges">           <i>yng</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ynkes">           <i>ynk</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="åres">            <i>år</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
<e c="todo check pardef" lm="snakkes"><i>snakk</i><par n="en/es__vblex"/></e>
